Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 18. Records and Reports.

§ 13.1-770.
Corporate records.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its shareholders and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of the board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation.

A corporation shall maintain accounting records in a form that permits preparation of its financial statements.

A corporation shall maintain a record of its current shareholders in alphabetical order by class and series, if any, of shares showing the address of, and the number and class and series, if any, of shares held by each shareholder. The foregoing shall not require the corporation to maintain, as part of such record of shareholders, beneficial owners whose shares are held by a nominee on the shareholder’s behalf except to the extent that the corporation has established and maintains a procedure for registration of such rights under §

13.1-664

. Nothing contained in this subsection shall require the corporation to include in such record the electronic mail address or other electronic contact information of a shareholder.

A corporation shall maintain its records in the form of a document, including an electronic record, or in another form capable of conversion into paper form within a reasonable time.

A corporation shall maintain the following records:

A copy of its articles of incorporation as currently in effect, and any notices to shareholders referred to in subdivision L 5 of §

13.1-604

specifying facts on which a filed document is dependent if those facts are not included in the articles of incorporation or otherwise available as specified in subdivision L 5 of §

13.1-604

;

Its bylaws as currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its board of directors creating one or more classes or series of shares, and fixing their relative rights, preferences, and limitations, if shares issued pursuant to those resolutions are outstanding;

The minutes of all shareholders’ meetings, and records of all action taken by shareholders without a meeting, for the past three years;

All written communications within the past three years to shareholders generally, including the financial statements furnished for the past three years under §

13.1-774

;

A list of the names and business addresses of its current directors and officers; and

A copy of its most recent annual report filed with the Commission under §

13.1-775

.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-47; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2008, c. 91; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subdivision E 1, deleted “and” following “incorporation” and inserted “and any notices to shareholders referred to in subdivision L 5 of §

13.1-604

regarding facts on which a filed document is dependent.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 added the last sentence of subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782, in subsection D, substituted “the form of a document, including an electronic record” for “written form”
and substituted “paper” for “written.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsections B and C, which read: “A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records. C. A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its shareholders, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all shareholders, in alphabetical order by class and series, if any, of shares showing the number and class and series, if any, of shares held by each. However, the foregoing shall not require the corporation or its agent to maintain, as part of such record of shareholders, beneficial owners whose shares are held by a nominee on the shareholder’s behalf except to the extent that the corporation has established and maintains a procedure for registration of such rights under §

13.1-664

”; in subsection E, substituted “maintain” for “keep a copy of”; rewrote subdivision E 1, which read: “Its articles or restated articles of incorporation, all amendments to them currently in effect, and any notices to shareholders referred to in subdivision L 5 of §

13.1-604

regarding facts on which a filed document is dependent”; in subdivision E 2, substituted “as” for “or restated bylaws and all amendments to them”; rewrote subdivision E 7, which read: “Its most recent annual report delivered to the Commission under §

13.1-775

”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-771.
Inspection of records by shareholders.

Subject to subsection D of §

13.1-772

, a shareholder is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation’s principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in subsection E of §

13.1-770

if the shareholder delivers a signed written notice to the corporation’s secretary of the shareholder’s demand at least 10 business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy.

For any meeting of shareholders for which the record date for determining shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting is different than the record date for notice of the meeting, any person who becomes a shareholder subsequent to the record date for notice of the meeting and is entitled to vote at the meeting is entitled to obtain from the corporation upon request the notice and any other information provided by the corporation to shareholders in connection with the meeting, unless the corporation has made such information generally available to shareholders by posting it on its website or by other generally recognized means. Failure of a corporation to provide such information does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

A shareholder is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the shareholder meets the requirements of subsection D and delivers a signed written notice to the corporation’s secretary of the shareholder’s demand at least 10 business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from minutes of any meeting of, or records of any actions taken without a meeting by, the board of directors or a committee of the board of director while acting in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation;

Accounting ledgers and related work papers used in the preparation of the corporation’s most recent annual financial statements; and

The record of shareholders of record maintained in accordance with subsection C of §

13.1-770

.

A shareholder may inspect and copy the records described in subsection C only if:

The shareholder (i) has been a shareholder for at least six months immediately preceding delivery of the shareholder’s demand or (ii) is the holder of record or beneficial owner of at least five percent of the outstanding shares entitled to vote generally in the election of directors;

The shareholder’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

The shareholder’s demand describes with reasonable particularity the shareholder’s purpose and the records the shareholder desires to inspect and copy; and

The records are directly connected with the shareholder’s purpose.

The corporation may enforce reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, or distribution of records described in subsection C.

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

This section does not affect:

The right of a shareholder to inspect records under §

13.1-661

or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

For any corporation that is not a public corporation, the power of a court, independently of this chapter, to compel the production of such records as the court shall order after finding that the shareholder has established that the shareholder has satisfied the requirements of subsection D and that (i) the records that the shareholder seeks are material to the protection of the shareholder’s rights as a shareholder and (ii) the disclosure of the records will not adversely affect the corporation’s interest.

For purposes of this section, other than subdivision C 3, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the shareholder’s behalf.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-47; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2008, c. 91; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the shareholder” for “he” and “the shareholder’s” for “his” throughout; deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” in subsection B and deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subdivision B 1; deleted “of this section” following “subsection B” in subsection C; and added subsection F.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 added “of record” at the end of subdivision B 3; in subdivision C 1, deleted “of record” following “has been a shareholder” and inserted “or beneficial owner”; and inserted “other than subdivision B 3” in subsection F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 redesignated former subsections B through F as
subsections C through G, respectively; added subsection B; substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C” in subsection C; in subdivision C 1, substituted “or a committee” for “records of any action of a committee,” inserted “or a committee of the board” and made a related change; and substituted “subdivision C 3” for “subdivision B 3” in subsection G.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsections A and C, substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C,” deleted “of a corporation” following “shareholder,” substituted “delivers a signed written notice to the corporation’s secretary” for “gives the corporation signed written notice,” and substituted “10” for “five” following “at least”; in subdivision C 1, inserted “or records of any actions taken without a meeting by” preceding “the board,” and deleted “minutes of any meeting of the shareholders, and records of action taken by the shareholders, board of directors, or a committee of the board without a meeting, to the extent not subject to inspection under subsection A” at the end; rewrote subdivision C 2, which read: “Accounting records of the corporation; and”; in subdivision C 3, added “maintained in accordance with subsection C of §

13.1-770

” at the end; in subdivision D 1, inserted the designations for clauses (i) and (ii), inserted “delivery of” following “preceding,” deleted “all of” following “percent of,” and added “entitled to vote generally in the election of directors” at the end; in subdivision D 3, substituted “shareholder’s demand” for “shareholder,” and inserted “and copy” for “inspect”; added subsection E; redesignated former subsections E through G as F through H, respectively; and rewrote subdivision G 2, which read: “The power of a court, independently of this chapter, to compel the production of corporate such records for examination”; and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 130.

§ 13.1-772.
Scope of inspection right.

A shareholder may appoint an agent or attorney to exercise the shareholder’s inspection and copying rights under §

13.1-771

.

The corporation may, if reasonable, satisfy the right of a shareholder to copy records by furnishing the shareholder copies by photocopy or other means chosen by the corporation, including furnishing copies through an electronic transmission.

The corporation may comply with a shareholder’s demand to inspect the record of shareholders under subdivision C 3 of §

13.1-771

by providing the shareholder with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of delivery of the shareholder’s demand.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge to cover the costs of providing copies of documents to the shareholder, which may be based on an estimate of such costs.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-47; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the agent or attorney” for “he” in subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “copies by xerographic” for “copies by” and inserted “including copies through an electronic transmission if available and so requested by the shareholder”; in subsection C, deleted “or” following “production” and inserted “and transmission”; and in subsection D, substituted “subdivision B 3” for “subdivision 3 of subsection B” and substituted “the shareholder” for “him.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 substituted “subdivision C 3” for “subdivision B 3” in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Foreign corporation. —

Former president and shareholder of a corporation was denied mandamus allowing him permission to inspect a corporation’s books and records in a Virginia court and under Delaware law, as the Delaware Chancery Court maintained exclusive jurisdiction to order inspection under Del. Code Ann. Title 8, § 220 and neither the Virginia Constitution nor General Assembly superceded such restriction; thus, he was forced to seek enforcement of his request in the Court of Chancery of Delaware. Foti v. Western Sizzlin Corp., 64 Va. Cir. 64, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 24 (Roanoke Feb. 6, 2004).

§ 13.1-773.
Court-ordered inspection.

If a corporation does not allow a shareholder who complies with subsection A of §

13.1-771

to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the circuit court in the city or county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or, if none in the Commonwealth, where its registered office is located, may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense upon application of the shareholder.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a shareholder who complies with subsections C and D of §

13.1-771

to inspect and copy the records required by subsection C, the shareholder may apply to the circuit court in the city or county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or, if none in the Commonwealth, where its registered office is located, for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on their confidentiality, use, or distribution by the demanding shareholder. If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may also order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s expenses incurred to obtain the order if the shareholder proves that the corporation (i) refused inspection without a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded or (ii) imposed unreasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, or distribution of the records demanded.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 substituted “subsections C and D” for “subsections B and C” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection B, deleted “inspect and copy any other record, the shareholder” preceding “who complies,” and inserted “to inspect and copy the records required by subsection C, the shareholder” preceding “may apply”; rewrote subsection C, which read: “If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may also order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred to obtain the order if the shareholder proves that the corporation refused inspection without a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded”; and deleted former subsection D, which read: “If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding shareholder”; and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 130.

§ 13.1-773.1.
Inspection of records by directors.

A director of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy the books, records and documents of the corporation at any reasonable time to the extent reasonably related to the performance of the director’s duties as a director, including duties as a member of a committee of the board of directors, but not for any other purpose or in any manner that would violate any duty to the corporation.

The circuit court of the city or county where the corporation’s principal office, or if none in the Commonwealth, its registered office, is located may order inspection and copying of the books, records and documents at the corporation’s expense upon application of a director who has been refused such inspection rights, unless the corporation establishes that the director is not entitled to such inspection rights. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If an order is issued, the court may include provisions protecting the corporation from undue burden or expense, and prohibiting the director from using information obtained upon exercise of the inspection rights in a manner that would violate a duty to the corporation, and may also order the corporation to reimburse the director for the director’s expenses incurred in connection with the application if the director proves that the corporation refused inspection without a reasonable basis for doubt about the director’s right to inspect the books, records, and documents demanded.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “of the board of directors” following “a committee”; in subsection B, inserted “at the corporation’s expense” preceding “upon application”; and in subsection C, substituted “expenses” for “reasonable costs, including reasonable counsel fees,” and substituted “the books, records, and documents” for “the records.”

§ 13.1-774.
Financial statements for shareholders.

Upon the written request of a shareholder, a corporation shall deliver or make available to the requesting shareholder by posting on its website or by other generally recognized means financial statements for the most recent fiscal year for which annual financial statements have been prepared for the corporation. The financial statements may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one or more of its subsidiaries, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the corporation’s fiscal year, an income statement for that year, and a statement of changes in shareholders’ equity for the year unless that information appears elsewhere in the financial statements. If financial statements for the specified period have been prepared for the corporation on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the corporation shall deliver or make available such financial statements to the requesting shareholder.

If the annual financial statements are audited or otherwise reported upon by a public accountant, the accountant’s report must accompany them. If the annual financial statements are not reported upon by a public accountant, the president or the person responsible for the corporation’s accounting records shall provide the shareholder with a statement of the basis of accounting used in preparation of the annual financial statements and a description of any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

A public corporation may fulfill its responsibilities under this section by delivering the specified financial statements, or otherwise making them available, in any manner permitted by the applicable rules and regulations of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B:

As a condition to delivering or making available financial statements to a requesting shareholder, the corporation may require the requesting shareholder to agree to reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, and distribution of such financial statements; and

The corporation may, if it reasonably determines that the shareholder’s request is not made in good faith or for a proper purpose, decline to deliver or make available such financial statements to that shareholder.

If a corporation does not respond to a shareholder’s request for financial statements pursuant to subsection A within 30 days of delivery of such request to the corporation’s secretary:

The requesting shareholder may apply to the circuit court in the city or county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or, if none in the Commonwealth, where its registered office is located for an order requiring delivery of or access to the requested financial statements. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders delivery or access to the requested financial statements, it may impose reasonable restrictions on their confidentiality, use, or distribution.

In such proceeding, if the corporation has declined to deliver or make available such financial statements because the requesting shareholder had been unwilling to agree to restrictions proposed by the corporation on the confidentiality, use, or distribution of such financial statements, the corporation shall have the burden of demonstrating that the restrictions proposed by the corporation were reasonable.

In such proceeding, if the corporation has declined to deliver or make available such financial statements pursuant to subdivision D 2 of §

13.1-774

, the corporation shall have the burden of demonstrating that it had reasonably determined that the shareholder’s request was not made in good faith or for a proper purpose.

If the court orders delivery or access to the requested financial statements, it may order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s expenses incurred to obtain such order unless the corporation establishes that it had refused delivery or access to the requested financial statements because the shareholder had refused to agree to reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, or distribution of the financial statements or that the corporation had reasonably determined that the shareholder’s request was not made in good faith or for a proper purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-47; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the accountant’s” for “his” in the first sentence of subsection B; substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection C; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 inserted “certified” twice in subsection B; and added subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Applicability. —

Section

13.1-774

foreclosed no portion of a shareholder’s suit against the other shareholders of a corporation because the shareholder was not, by means of the case, attempting to obtain an annual financial statement from the corporation. Instead, the shareholder was attempting to have the shareholders found liable for breach of fiduciary duty, recover damages for the alleged breach, and have any harm to the corporation corrected. Willliams v. Stevens, 86 Va. Cir. 385, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 28 (Norfolk Apr. 1, 2013).

§ 13.1-775.
Annual report of domestic and foreign corporations.

Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, shall file, within the time prescribed by this section, an annual report setting forth:

The name of the corporation, the address of its principal office, and the jurisdiction of its formation;

The address of the registered office of the corporation in the Commonwealth, including both (i) the post office address with street and number, if any, and (ii) the name of the county or city in which it is located, and the name of its registered agent in the Commonwealth at such address;

The names and post office addresses of the directors and the principal officers of the corporation; and

A statement of the aggregate number of shares that the corporation has authority to issue.

The report shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission and shall supply the information as of the date of the report.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the annual report of a domestic or foreign corporation shall be filed with the Commission on or before the last day of the twelfth month next succeeding the month in which it was incorporated or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, and on or before such date in each year thereafter. The report shall be filed no earlier than three months prior to its due date each year. If the report appears to be incomplete or inaccurate, the Commission shall return it for correction or explanation. Otherwise the Commission shall file it in the clerk’s office. At the discretion of the Commission, the annual report due date for a corporation may be extended, on a monthly basis for a period of not less than one month nor more than 11 months, at the request of its registered agent of record or as may be necessary to distribute annual report due dates of corporations as equally as practicable throughout the year on a monthly basis.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-9, 13-11, 13-32, 13-213, 13.1-120, 13.1-121; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1981, c. 523; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 233; 1987, c. 2; 1997, c. 216; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 753; 2018, c. 132; 2019, c. 734.

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, in subsection C, in the first sentence, inserted “Except as otherwise provided in this subsection” at the beginning and substituted “by the last day of the twelfth month next succeeding the date it was incorporated or authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth, and by such date in each year thereafter” for “between January 1 and April 1 of each year after the calendar year in which it was incorporated or authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” and added the present second and fourth sentences.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subdivision A 2 and subsection C; substituted “in the” for “in this” and “this section” for “this chapter” in subsection A; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 753 inserted “prescribed and” in subsection B; and in the first sentence in subsection C, twice substituted “on or before” for “by” and substituted “month in which it was incorporated” for “date it was incorporated.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 132, in subdivision A 4, substituted “that” for “which” and deleted “itemized by class” from the end.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 1, substituted “jurisdiction of its formation” for “state or country under whose laws it is incorporated”; and in subsection B, substituted “a form” for “forms.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

§ 13.1-775.1.
Annual registration fees to be paid by domestic and foreign corporations; penalty for failure to pay timely.

Every domestic corporation and every foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall pay into the state treasury on or before the last day of the twelfth month next succeeding the month in which it was incorporated or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, and by such date in each year thereafter, an annual registration fee as prescribed by this section, provided that (i) for a domestic corporation that became a domestic corporation by conversion from a domestic nonstock corporation or limited liability company, or by domestication or conversion from a foreign corporation, nonstock corporation, or limited liability company that was authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth at the time of the domestication or conversion, the annual registration fee shall be paid each year on or before the date on which its annual registration fee was due prior to the domestication or conversion and (ii) for a domestic corporation that became a domestic corporation by conversion from a domestic limited partnership or business trust, or from a foreign limited partnership or business trust that was registered to transact business in the Commonwealth at the time of the conversion, the annual registration fee shall be paid each year on or before the last day of the twelfth month next succeeding the month in which it was originally incorporated, organized, or formed as an entity, except the initial annual registration fee to be paid by the domestic corporation shall be due in the year after the calendar year in which the conversion became effective when the annual registration fee of the domestic or foreign limited partnership or business trust was paid for the calendar year in which it converted, or when the month in which the conversion was effective precedes the month in which the domestic corporation was originally incorporated, organized, or formed as an entity by two months or less. At the discretion of the Commission, the annual registration fee due date for a corporation may be extended, on a monthly basis for a period of not less than one month nor more than 11 months, at the request of its registered agent of record or as may be necessary to distribute annual registration fee due dates of corporations as equally as practicable throughout the year on a monthly basis.Any such corporation whose number of authorized shares is 5,000 or less shall pay an annual registration fee of $50. Any such corporation whose number of authorized shares is more than 5,000 shall pay an annual registration fee of $50 plus $15 for each 5,000 shares or fraction thereof in excess of 5,000 shares, up to a maximum of $850.The annual registration fee shall be irrespective of any specific license tax or other tax or fee imposed by law upon the corporation for the privilege of carrying on its business in the Commonwealth or upon its franchise, property, or receipts.

Each year, the Commission shall ascertain from its records the number of authorized shares of each domestic corporation and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, as of the first day of the second month next preceding the month in which it was incorporated or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and, except as provided in subsection A, shall assess against each such corporation the annual registration fee herein imposed. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (i) for a domestic corporation that became a domestic corporation by conversion from a domestic nonstock corporation or limited liability company, or by domestication or conversion from a foreign corporation, nonstock corporation, or limited liability company that was authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth at the time of the domestication or conversion, the assessment shall be made as of the first day of the second month next preceding the month in which its annual registration fee was due prior to the conversion or domestication and (ii) for a domestic corporation that became a domestic corporation by conversion from a domestic or foreign limited partnership or business trust, except as provided in subsection A, the assessment shall be made as of the first day of the second month next preceding the month in which the domestic corporation was originally incorporated, organized, or formed as an entity. In any year in which a corporation’s annual registration fee due date is extended pursuant to subsection A, the annual registration fee assessment shall be increased by a prorated amount to cover the period of extension. A statement of the assessment, when made, shall be forwarded by the clerk of the Commission to the Comptroller and to each such corporation.

Any domestic or foreign corporation that fails to pay the annual registration fee herein imposed within the time prescribed shall incur a penalty of 10 percent of the annual registration fee, or $10, whichever is greater, which shall be added to the amount of the annual registration fee due. The penalty shall be in addition to any other penalty or liability imposed by law.

The fees paid into the state treasury under this section shall be set aside as a special fund to be used only by the Commission as it deems necessary to defray all costs of staffing, maintaining and operating the office of the clerk of the Commission, together with all other costs incurred by the Commission in supervising, implementing and administering the provisions of Part 5 (§

8.9A-501

et seq.) of Title 8.9A, this title, except for Chapters 5 (§

13.1-501

et seq.) and 8 (§

13.1-557

et seq.) and Article 7 (§

55.1-653

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 55.1, provided that one-half of the fees collected shall be credited to the general fund. The excess of fees collected over the projected costs of administration in the next fiscal year shall be paid into the general fund prior to the close of the fiscal year.

History.

1988, c. 405; 1991, c. 311; 1997, c. 216; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 753; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to annual registration fees to be paid by domestic and foreign business trusts, see §

13.1-1252

.

As to collection by suit and of unpaid bills under the Virginia Business Trust Act, see §

13.1-1256

.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Article 7 (§

55.1-653

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 55.1” for “Article 6 (§ 55-142.1 et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 55.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 486 C as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

13.1-775.1

, Code of Virginia, the State Corporation Commission shall continue the following annual registration fees for domestic and foreign corporations. The new annual rates shall be $100 for every foreign and domestic corporation authorized to do business in the Commonwealth whose number of authorized shares is 5,000 shares or less. Any such corporation whose number of authorized shares is more than 5,000 shall pay an annual registration fee of $100 plus $30 for each 5,000 shares or fraction thereof in excess of 5,000 up to a maximum of $1,700. The commission shall deposit these funds into a special fund and transfer three-fourths of the receipts to the general fund semiannually.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, substituted “by its due date each calendar year” for “on or before April 1 in each year after the calendar year in which it was incorporated or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth” in the first paragraph of subsection A and, in subsection B, substituted “the first day of the second month next preceding the month of the corporation’s annual registration fee due date each year” for “January 1 of each year,” added the present second sentence, and deleted “before March 15” following “Clerk of the State Corporation Commission” in the present third sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” twice in subsection A and in subsection B; deleted “State Corporation” preceding “Commission” twice in subsection B and in the first occurrence in subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 753 rewrote the section.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the first sentence in subsection A, which read: “Every domestic corporation and every foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall pay into the state treasury on or before the last day of the twelfth month next succeeding the month in which it was incorporated or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, and by such date in each year thereafter, an annual registration fee as prescribed by this section, provided that the initial annual registration fee to be paid by a domestic corporation created by entity conversion shall be due in the year after the calendar year in which it converted”; and inserted the second sentence of subsection B. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 275, 288; 18 M.J. Taxation, § 61.

§ 13.1-775.2.
Collection of unpaid bills for registration fees.

The registration fee with penalty and interest shall be enforceable, in addition to existing remedies for the collection of taxes, levies and fees, by action in equity, in the name of the Commonwealth, in the appropriate circuit court. Venue shall be in accordance with §

8.01-261

.

History.

1988, c. 405.